Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Chapter 14. Rivers, Lakes, and Streams.

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions relating to the 2003 transfer of responsibility for protection of habitat in rivers, lakes, and streams and related functions from the Department of Fish and Game to the Department of Natural Resources, see § 46, E.O. 107, in the Executive Orders pamphlet.